Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1071.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 505.2(a) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a clause and subsection (c) is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 505.2. Limited Wineries.--(a) In the interest of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 promoting tourism and recreational development in Pennsylvania, holders of a limited winery license may:* * *(7) Obtain an off-premises wine catering permit to use off the licensed premises in partnership with an otherwise unlicensed BYOB restaurant where the licensee may sell wine, by the glass, open bottle or other container and in any mixture together with food, for consumption on those premises according to the following:(i) The licensee may be issued no more than three off-premises wine catering permits to be used in partnership with a BYOB restaurant.(ii) Any licensee that wishes to obtain an off-premises wine catering permit for use at a BYOB restaurant must notify the board and pay an initial fee of five hundred dollars ($500) per permit application and, upon approval, shall be subject to an annual renewal fee of five hundred dollars ($500).(iii) The fees under subclause (ii) shall be paid into The State Stores Fund.(iv) The board may approve or disapprove each permit if the applicant fails to meet the requirements of this act or has previously conducted a function that did not meet the requirements of this act. Any violation of this act or the board's regulations relating to this clause may be the basis for the issuance of a citation under section 471, the nonrenewal of the license under section 470 or the refusal by the board to issue subsequent permits. This penalty shall be in addition to any other remedies available to the enforcement bureau or the board.(v) Alcohol may only be served at the permitted location 20250HB1071PN1171 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 between the hours of noon and nine o'clock postmeridian.(vi) All servers shall be certified under the board's responsible alcohol management program as required under section 471.1.(vii) A permit shall not be held at a location that is already subject to the applicant's or another licensee's off-premises wine catering permit.(viii) A permit shall not be issued to an applicant whose license is in safekeeping.(ix) A permit shall not be issued to a location that is subject to a pending objection by the Director of the Bureau of Licensing or the board under section 470(a.1).(x) A permit shall not be issued to a location that is subject to a pending license suspension under section 471 or the one-year prohibition on the issuance or transfer of a license under section 471(b).(xi) Alcohol may not be taken from the permitted location by any patron, but the applicant may transport alcohol to and from the applicant's licensed premises to the proposed premises.(xii) Written notice of the off-premises wine catering permit as enumerated in subclause (xiii) shall be provided to the local police and the enforcement bureau at least fourteen (14) days in advance of the event.(xiii) Written notice shall be provided to the board and must include the location of the BYOB restaurant, dates and times that the permit will be used, authorization by the local municipality where the permit is being utilized, as well as any information the board shall prescribe. The board may, in its discretion, accept notice in an electronic format.(xiv) If a permit is located on private property, the owner 20250HB1071PN1171 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the property is deemed to have submitted to the jurisdiction of the enforcement bureau, and the warrant required by section 211(a)(2) shall not be necessary for the enforcement bureau to enter and search the premises during the function or any activity related to the function.(xv) The off-premises wine catering permit location shall be subject to section 493(34).(xvi) A permit shall not be issued to locations that are subject to a pending, protested transfer application.(xvii) A permit may not be issued to a license holder whose license is subject to a pending objection by the Director of the Bureau of Licensing or the board under section 470(a.1).(xviii) A permit shall not be issued to a licensee for use in a location that is mobile.* * *(c) As used in this section:* * *"BYOB restaurant" shall mean a restaurant, eating place or café not licensed by the board that offers on-premises dining, has a valid health permit and allows patrons who are 21 years of age or older to bring wine, beer or spirits to consume while dining on the premises.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1071PN1171 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324